Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 3. Formation of Credit Union.

§ 6.2-1320.
Incorporation.

Five or more residents of the Commonwealth who are of legal age and share a common bond referred to in subsection B of §

6.2-1327

may establish, pursuant to the provisions of the Virginia Nonstock Corporation Act (§

13.1-801

et seq.), a corporation for the purpose of conducting business as a credit union as provided in this chapter. Every corporation organized under this chapter shall include in the corporate name the words “credit union” as well as some other distinguishing word or words.

Credit unions incorporated pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to the provisions of the Virginia Nonstock Corporation Act (§

13.1-801

et seq.), except as may otherwise be provided in this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-204; 1956, c. 433; 1958, c. 139; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-196; 1968, c. 560; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.13; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1321.
Certificate of authority.

Before it begins to do any business, an organizing credit union shall apply for and obtain from the Commission a certificate of authority. An application, accompanied by a fee of $300, shall be made on a form prescribed by the Commission. The Commission shall issue such a certificate if it finds that:

The credit union has been formed for no purpose other than the conduct of a legitimate credit union business;

The moral fitness, financial responsibility, and other qualifications of the proposed officers and directors are such as to command the confidence of the members;

The field of membership of the proposed credit union complies with §

6.2-1327

, and all other applicable provisions of law have been complied with;

Share accounts in the credit union will be insured by an approved insuring organization; and

Establishment of the proposed credit union is economically advisable. In reaching a decision on whether the establishment of a credit union is economically advisable, the Commission shall give consideration to 12 C.F.R. § 701.1, which incorporates the National Credit Union Administration’s Interpretive Ruling and Policy Statement 99-1 as it pertains to economic advisability.

The Commission may issue a certificate on condition that the credit union shall not begin to do business until it is actually issued insurance of accounts by an approved insuring organization.

A credit union that is not actually issued insurance of accounts by an approved insuring organization shall not receive funds or sell any shares.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-205; 1952, c. 22; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-197; 1968, c. 560; 1974, c. 115; 1978, c. 683; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.14; 1999, c. 63; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1322.
Contents of bylaws; amendments to bylaws generally.

The bylaws of a credit union shall specify:

The name of the credit union;

The purpose for which it was formed;

The time of the annual meeting of the members of the credit union, or a provision that the board of directors may set the time for the meeting. Such a meeting shall be held each calendar year. Notice of all meetings shall be given in a manner prescribed in the bylaws, subject to compliance with §

13.1-842

;

The number, authority, and the duties of the directors and the authority, duties, and maximum compensation of all officers;

The conditions and qualifications for membership;

The number of members of the credit committee, if any, and of the supervisory committee, with their respective authorities and duties;

The conditions upon which shares may be issued, transferred, or withdrawn;

The conditions upon which loans may be made and repaid;

The manner of effecting the forfeiture of a member’s shares when a member’s share account balance is below the amount established by the bylaws and remains below such amount for a period of two years;

The manner in which dividends shall be determined and paid out;

The manner in which remaining assets are to be distributed in the event of dissolution after all distributions required by subdivision A 1 of §

13.1-907

have been made; and

The manner in which bylaws may be amended.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-207; 1956, c. 90; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-198; 1968, c. 560; 1980, c. 181; 1983, c. 300; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.15; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1323.
Amendments to articles of incorporation and bylaws.

Subject to the provisions of subsection B and §§

13.1-886

,

13.1-892

, and

13.1-893

, the articles of incorporation or the bylaws of a credit union may be amended as provided in the articles and bylaws, as the case may be. Amendments to the articles of incorporation shall be accomplished as provided in §§

13.1-888

and

13.1-889

.

If proposed amendments to the articles of incorporation or bylaws include an amendment to expand the field of membership of a credit union, then the amendments shall be submitted to the Commissioner, who shall approve or disapprove them within 30 days. No amendments to the articles of incorporation or bylaws that include an amendment to expand the field of membership shall be effective until such amendment has been approved by the Commissioner, who may extend the period for approval as he may deem necessary for as much as an additional 30 days.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-208; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-199; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.16; 1999, c. 63; 2010, c. 794; 2012, cc. 44, 560.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 44 and 560 are identical, and rewrote the section.

§ 6.2-1324.
Bylaws amended by Commission.

Any bylaw may be amended by the Commission by order entered on its order book and certified to the credit union. Before entering any such order the Commission shall notify the credit union of the proposed amendment and afford it an opportunity to be heard.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-207; 1956, c. 90; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-198; 1968, c. 560; 1980, c. 181; 1983, c. 300; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.17; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1325.
Fiscal year.

The fiscal year of every credit union shall end at the close of business on December 31.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-218; 1956, c. 90; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-209; 1968, c. 560; 1984, c. 353; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.18; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1326.
Establishing, moving, and closing offices.

As used in this section, “service facility” means a physical facility at a location other than its main office that is wholly owned by the credit union establishing it. “Service facility” does not include any automated teller machine, cash-dispensing machine, or similar electronic or computer terminal, regardless of whether it (i) is located on credit union premises or premises properly considered part of an authorized office of the credit union or (ii) receives or records deposits or disburses loan proceeds.

A credit union may maintain service facilities at locations other than its main office if the maintenance of such offices is reasonably necessary to serve its members, subject to the approval of the Commission. An application to establish such a service facility, accompanied by a fee of $200, shall be made on a form prescribed by the Commission. The Commission shall approve the establishment of the proposed service facility if it appears that the interest of the members of the applicant will be served thereby and that such establishment will not impair the financial condition of the applicant or any other credit union.

A credit union may (i) contract with one or more other credit unions subject to this chapter or organized under the laws of the United States or any other state to provide for the operation of one or more shared service facilities or (ii) provide for its members to have the use of one or more shared service facilities by contracting with a credit union service organization approved by the Commissioner for such purpose. A participating credit union may also invest in the credit union service organization. A credit union shall give prior written notice to the Commissioner of its participation in each shared service facility or credit union service organization. Notice to the Commissioner of a credit union’s participation in a credit union service organization shall satisfy the requirement of subsection E that the Commissioner be notified of the establishment of an office, if the credit union service organization has notified the Commissioner of the establishment of the shared service facility.

The authority of the Commission and the Commissioner to supervise and regulate credit unions, as set forth in Article 2 (§

6.2-1308

et seq.) of this chapter, shall extend to any shared service facility and any credit union service organization that is involved in the operation of a shared service facility that provides service to credit unions organized under this chapter, except that such authority shall not extend to the assets, records, books, and accounts of any federal credit union or credit union organized under the laws of another state.

A credit union may change the location of its main office, a service facility, or office, and may close any such office, provided it gives at least 30 days’ prior written notice thereof to the Commissioner in such form as he may prescribe. A credit union shall notify the Commissioner in writing within 10 days after it establishes, relocates, or closes any office. A credit union shall notify the Commissioner of its withdrawal from participation in any shared service facility within 10 days of such withdrawal.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-212; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-203; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.20; 1995, c. 326; 2006, c. 754; 2010, c. 794; 2015, cc. 19, 445.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 19 and 445 are identical, and in subsection A, added the second sentence.